Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 803.600 is amended to read:
803.600. A trip permit grants authority  to temporarily operate a vehicle on the highways of this
state under  circumstances where the operation would not otherwise be legal because the vehicle is
not registered by this state or because provisions relating to the  vehicle’s registration do not allow
the operation. The Department of Transportation shall provide for the issuance of trip permits in  a
manner consistent  with this section. All of the following apply to permits issued under this section:
(1) The department shall issue the  following types of trip permits to authorize the described type
of operation and, except as provided in [ subsection] subsections (2) and (3) of this section, may not
issue trip permits for any other purpose:
(a) A heavy motor vehicle trip permit may be issued for the  following vehicles that are not
registered in this state:
(A) Motor vehicles with a combined weight or loaded weight of more than 10,000 pounds;
(B) Truck tractors that are more than 8,000 pounds; or
(C) Fixed load motor vehicles.
(b) A permit described in paragraph (a) of this subsection is valid for 10 consecutive days.
(c) A heavy trailer trip permit may be issued for a trailer that will be operated on  the highways
at a loaded weight of more than 8,000 pounds or  that is a fixed load vehicle, and that is not regis-
tered to allow operation of  the vehicle in this state. A permit described in this paragraph is valid
for 10 consecutive days. This paragraph does not apply to travel trailers.
(d) A light vehicle trip permit may be issued for a vehicle with  a combined weight or loaded
weight of less than  10,001 pounds that is not a fixed load vehicle and that is not registered to allow
operation of the vehicle in this state. Permits described in  this paragraph may be issued for a period
of 21 consecutive days. The department  may not issue more than two permits under this paragraph
in a 12-month period for  any one vehicle unless all registered owners of the vehicle are replaced
by new owners. If there is  a complete change in ownership of the vehicle, as shown by the regis-
tration records for the vehicle, a new owner may receive permits for the vehicle  under this para-
graph as if no permits had been issued for the vehicle. This paragraph does not apply  to campers,
travel trailers or motor homes, which are eligible for recreational vehicle trip permits under  para-
graph (e) of this subsection.
(e) A recreational vehicle trip permit may be issued for a period  of up to 10 consecutive days
for a camper, travel trailer or motor home that  is not registered for operation in this state. A
person buying a recreational  vehicle trip permit must show proof satisfactory to the department that
Enrolled House Bill 2660 (HB 2660-A) Page 1
the person is the  owner of the camper, travel trailer or motor home for which the permit will be
granted. A person may not receive recreational vehicle  trip permits authorizing more than 10 days
of operation in any 12-month period. The department may determine  by rule the method for ensuring
a person has not exceeded the maximum number of days of operation allowed by the permit.
(f) A registration weight trip permit may be issued for a vehicle that is registered  in this state,
to allow the vehicle to be operated with a greater combined weight  or loaded weight than is per-
mitted by the registration weight established for the vehicle or at a greater combined weight  or
loaded weight than is otherwise permitted under the registration for the vehicle if the  vehicle is not
required to establish a registration weight. A permit issued under this paragraph does not authorize
movements or operations for which a variance permit is  required under ORS 818.200. A permit is-
sued under this paragraph shall show the maximum  registration weight allowed for operation under
the permit. A permit issued under this paragraph is valid for 10 consecutive days.
(g) A registered vehicle trip permit may be issued for a vehicle that is registered in this state
to allow  the vehicle to operate under conditions or in ways not permitted by the terms of the vehicle
registration. The department shall determine by rule the kinds of operation for which  permits may
be issued under this paragraph. A permit  issued under this paragraph is valid for 10 consecutive
days.
(2) The department shall allow a person issued a vehicle  dealer certificate under ORS 822.020
or a towing business certificate under ORS 822.205 to issue a 10-day trip permit to a person who
buys a motor vehicle from the person with the certificate if the  registration stickers are removed
in accordance with ORS 803.565. The following apply to trip permits issued under this subsection:
(a) A permit issued under this subsection allows operation of  the motor vehicle in this state for
the purpose of registering the vehicle.
(b) A permit issued under this subsection is valid for a period of 10 consecutive days.
(c) A person with a vehicle dealer certificate or a  towing business certificate may not issue
more than two permits under this subsection for the same motor vehicle.
(3) The department shall allow a person issued a vehicle dealer  certificate under ORS
822.020 to issue a 30-day  recreational vehicle trip permit to a person who buys a recreational
vehicle from the vehicle dealer if the  person buying the recreational vehicle does not reside
in Oregon and according to the purchase agreement the person intends to  title the recre-
ational vehicle in a state other than Oregon. The following apply to a trip permit  issued un-
der this subsection:
(a) The permit issued under this subsection is valid for a period of 30 consecutive days.
(b) A vehicle dealer may not issue more than one permit under this subsection  for the
same recreational vehicle.
[(3)] (4) The following requirements  for records are established concerning permits issued under
this section:
(a) Any carrier regulated by the department shall maintain records of heavy  motor vehicle and
heavy trailer trip permits and registration weight trip permits issued to the carrier  as required by
the department by rule.
(b) Requirements for the department to maintain records concerning  trip permits are established
under ORS 802.200.
[(4)] (5)  An owner or  operator of a vehicle may obtain a trip permit. The fees for issuance of
trip permits are as provided under ORS 803.645.
[(5)] (6)  The department shall make the trip permits available to all field offices  and agents
maintained by the department and may make arrangements for the issuance of the permits by des-
ignated individuals, firms or associations  for the convenience of the motoring public. This subsection
does not  require the department to make trip permits described in [ subsection] subsections (2) and
(3) of this section available to anyone other than persons with vehicle  dealer certificates or towing
business certificates.
Enrolled House Bill 2660 (HB 2660-A) Page 2
[(6)] (7) The department may  also sell heavy motor vehicle, heavy trailer and registration weight
trip permits in advance of issuance to contractors, transportation  companies and other users for
issuance to their own vehicles or vehicles under their control.
[(7)] (8) The department shall adopt rules for the issuance, sale and control of trip permits.
[(8)] (9)  Trip permits are not required for the  operation of unregistered vehicles where such
operation is permitted as follows:
(a) By vehicle dealers as permitted under ORS 822.040.
(b) By vehicle transporters as permitted under ORS 822.310.
(c) By towing businesses as permitted under ORS 822.210.
[(9)] (10)  Trip permits are not required for the  operation of unregistered vehicles where such
operation is permitted under ORS 803.305.
[(10)] (11) Unregistered  vehicles that are operated without a trip permit are subject to the pro-
hibitions and penalties for operation of unregistered vehicles under ORS 803.300 or  803.315, as ap-
propriate.
[(11)] (12) A trip permit may be issued to  a school vehicle registered under ORS 805.050 for use
of the vehicle for purposes not permitted under ORS 805.050.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 803.601 is amended to read:
803.601. Fees collected by the Department of Transportation  from a person  issued a vehicle
dealer certificate under ORS 822.020  for recreational vehicle trip  permits described in ORS
803.600 shall be transferred to the State Parks and Recreation Department Fund  established by ORS
390.134 and are continuously appropriated to the State Parks and Recreation  Department for the
purposes specified in ORS 390.134.
SECTION 3.  ORS 803.602 is amended to read:
803.602. An applicant for a light vehicle trip permit, a  recreational vehicle trip permit for a
motor vehicle or a trip permit issued under ORS 803.600 (2)  or (3)  must submit, at the time of ap-
plication, proof indicating that the vehicle that will be operated  under the permit is covered by an
insurance policy that meets the requirements of ORS 806.080 and will continue to be covered by the
policy for as long as the permit is valid. The proof must include the name of the insurer  and the
policy number. The Department of Transportation or, if the permit is issued under ORS  803.600 (2)
or (3) , the person with the vehicle dealer  certificate or towing business certificate shall refuse to
issue a permit to a person who does not present the proof required by this section.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 803.645 is amended to read:
803.645. Fees for trip permits issued under ORS 803.600 are as follows:
(1) For a heavy motor vehicle trip permit, $43.
(2) For a heavy trailer trip permit, $10.
(3) For a light vehicle trip permit, $35.
(4) For a recreational vehicle trip permit, $35.
(5) For a registration weight trip permit, $5.
(6) For a registered vehicle trip permit, $7.50.
(7) For a 10-day trip permit issued under ORS  803.600 (2) by a person with a vehicle dealer
certificate or a towing business certificate, $15.
(8) For a 30-day  trip permit issued under ORS 803.600 (3) by a person with a vehicle dealer
certificate, $70.
Enrolled House Bill 2660 (HB 2660-A) Page 3
Passed by House April 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 1, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2660 (HB 2660-A) Page 4